Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2410
Emergency Box Drug Act; act, how cited.

Sections 71-2410 to 71-2417 shall be known and may be cited as the Emergency Box Drug Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 182.